California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
The department, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, may enter into reciprocal agreements with corresponding state agencies of other states regarding the interstate transportation of poor and indigent persons, and to arrange with the proper officials in this state for the acceptance, transfer, and support of persons receiving public aid in other states in accordance with the terms of such reciprocal agreements; provided, that this state shall not nor shall any county or other political subdivision of this state be committed to the support of persons who are not in the opinion of the department entitled to public support by the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18401.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18402.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Transfer of Dependents Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Relief Law of 1945 [18450. - 18524.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [18450. - 18460.]

18450.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Relief Law of 1945.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18451.

The provisions of this chapter (except the provisions of this section) are suspended and continue suspended from operation until the occurrence of an economic emergency in this state, which results from widespread hardship and destitution and necessitates immediate action for the relief of such hardship and destitution. No act shall be done nor power be exercised nor money be expended under or pursuant to such provisions until the occurrence of such an economic emergency has been determined as provided in this section.

Ascertainment and determination of the fact of the occurrence of such an economic emergency is committed to the Senate and Assembly and to the Governor. If and when the Senate and Assembly, by concurrent resolution filed with the Secretary of State, find and declare, and the Governor, by his proclamation filed with the Secretary of State, finds and declares, that there exists an economic emergency in this state, which results from widespread hardship and destitution and necessitates immediate action for the relief of such hardship and destitution (the resolution and the proclamation, respectively, to contain a statement of the facts upon which the finding is based), such an economic emergency is determined to have occurred and to exist, and thenceforth all of the provisions of this chapter are fully operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18452.

After the provisions of this chapter become operative, the provisions of Part 5 of this division, relating to county aid and relief to indigents, shall not apply to any person who receives or is eligible to receive relief under this chapter; but Part 5 is not repealed by this chapter, and shall continue in full force and effect in respect to persons not eligible to receive relief under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18453.

As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this article have the meanings set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18454.

“Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

18455.

“Aid” means state financial assistance to counties for the direct cost of relief and the cost of administration thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18456.

“Relief” means assistance in cash or in kind provided to individuals or families to relieve hardship and destitution.

Relief to a person includes relief to his dependents, but relief does not include hospital or medical care.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18457.

In accordance with the provisions of this chapter, every county shall provide relief to needy persons who are residents of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18458.

For the purposes of this chapter, a resident of the state is a person who comes within all of the following descriptions:

(a) Who has lived continuously in the state for a period of one year preceding his application for relief.

(b) Who, during the one-year period, has not received any form of public assistance from any other state or political subdivision thereof.

(c) Who has not lost his residence by remaining away from this state for an uninterrupted period of one year. Absence from the state for labor or other special or temporary purpose does not occasion loss of residence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18459.

For the purposes of this chapter, a person who is a resident of the state is a resident of the county in which he has resided continuously for one year immediately preceding his application for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18460.

A county may incur all necessary expenses in transporting a nonresident applicant for or recipient of relief under this chapter to another state or county, when information at hand reasonably tends to show that the person has a legal residence in that state or county. The state shall reimburse the county for the full amount of the cost of such transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [18470. - 18478.]

18470.

The direct administration of this chapter shall be carried out by the boards of supervisors of the several counties, directly or through their authorized agents. The administration shall be supervised by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18471.

The department shall:

(a) Establish minimum and maximum standards for the amount and form of relief, on a budgetary basis, as provided in Sections 18472, 18473, and 18474.

(b) Establish standards of eligibility for relief, which shall be of uniform application throughout the state.

(c) Make investigations in relation to the administration of relief.

(d) Secure information and make reports thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18472.

The department shall from time to time fix for each county maximum and minimum relief case budgets within the range of which the board of supervisors may establish its own policies.

All budgets and standards shall be based upon need and minimum budgets shall be sufficient to maintain the recipient and his dependents in accordance with minimum living requirements as provided in Section 18473.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18473.

In determining and redetermining budgets and standards, the department may give consideration to living costs and may establish budgets and standards varying in monetary worth or amount, but providing a standard of living compatible with decency and health.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18474.

Relief may be granted in cash or in kind, but relief may be granted in kind only after the method has been approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18475.

All income received by a person or family, regardless of source, shall be considered in determining the amount of relief to be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18476.

In administering any funds appropriated or made available to the department for disbursement through the counties for relief purposes, the department shall:

(a) Require as a condition for receiving such grants-in-aid that the county shall bear the proportion of the total expense of furnishing relief required to be paid by the county under Section 18521.

(b) Establish rules and regulations, not in conflict with law, defining and controlling the conditions under which state aid may be granted or refused.

(c) Terminate any grants-in-aid to any county if the laws providing such grants, or the minimum standards prescribed by the department, are not complied with by the county or its officers or employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18477.

If any county fails to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the rules and regulations or orders of the department for the administration of relief by the county under this chapter, the director of the department shall formally notify the county of the particular respects in which it fails to comply with the law or the rules and regulations of the department, and of the changes which are necessary to effect full compliance. The county shall be allowed a reasonable time to effect compliance; if it fails to do so within such reasonable time, it shall be ordered to appear before the director to show cause, if it has any, for its failure to comply with the law or the rules and regulations of the department.

If a county is charged by the director with failure to comply with the law or the rules and regulations of the department, the county may demand a public hearing before the director. If a hearing is demanded, the director shall hold it promptly.

If the director finds that a county has failed to comply with the law or the rules and regulations of the department, and is unwilling or unable to make the changes necessary to effect full compliance, the director may withhold financial assistance for the direct and administrative costs of relief, or either, until the county complies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18478.

The department may operate the relief administration in any county after the denial of financial assistance to the county in accordance with the provisions of Section 18477, and the county proportion of the costs thereof shall be charged against the county and shall be a proper charge against the county. The department shall certify to the county auditor any amounts so charged against the county, the county auditor shall include in his state settlement report rendered to the Controller in the months of January and June the amounts so certified and due under the provisions of this section, and the county treasurer, at the time of the settlement with the state in such months, shall pay to the State Treasurer, upon the order of the Controller, the amounts due under the provisions of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedure [18490. - 18496.]

18490.

Application for relief may be made to the county of which the applicant is a resident, or, in the case of an applicant who is a resident of the state but who is not a resident of any county, to the county in which the applicant is present.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18491.

The board of supervisors of every county as a board, or by committee or by such person as it may authorize, shall investigate every application for relief under this chapter, shall supervise by periodic visitation every person receiving such relief, shall devise ways and means for bringing persons unable to maintain themselves to self-support, and shall keep full and complete records of such investigation, supervision, relief, and rehabilitation as shall be prescribed by the department.

Such records shall be confidential and shall not be open to examination or inspection, except by the grand jury of the county or by a board or an officer of the state or the county charged with the supervision or direction of such relief or with the control of the expenditure of funds applicable to such relief.

Any citizen shall be entitled to demand and receive from the board, officer, committee, or person having custody of such records a statement of the amount, character, and value of the relief received by any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18492.

Persons eligible for relief, who are residents of the state and residents of the county in which they apply for relief, shall be granted relief by the county of their residence, and the state shall pay to the county the state’s share of the cost of the relief.

Persons eligible for relief, who are residents of the state but who are not residents of any county, shall be granted relief by the county in which they apply for relief, and the state shall pay to the county providing the relief the full cost of the relief provided, until such persons have remained in a county for the period necessary to acquire residence in that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18493.

In case of dispute between two or more counties as to the responsibility for any person, or in case of dispute between a county and the department, either may appeal to the department for a hearing. The decision of the department is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18494.

If any applicant or recipient is dissatisfied with the action of the board of supervisors, he shall, upon filing a petition with the department, have the right of appeal and shall be accorded an opportunity for a fair hearing. The department shall set such appeal for hearing 30 working days from the filing of the request and shall give all parties concerned written notice of the time and place at least 10 days prior to the hearing. At the hearing, the applicant or recipient may appear in person with counsel of his own choosing or in person and without such counsel.

The department shall consider the appeal and shall dismiss the appeal or award relief as prescribed in this chapter. The board of supervisors shall then pay to such person the sum awarded, if any, by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 110, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

18496.

Whenever an applicant or recipient loses an appeal made pursuant to Section 18494, the applicant or recipient shall be liable for any amount paid pending the hearing which was at issue in the hearing, to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 110, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Eligibility [18500. - 18504.]

18500.

Relief shall be provided only to persons who are in need, as determined by an investigation as prescribed by the department. Subject to the rules and regulations of the department, the county shall grant such emergency relief as may be necessary pending completion of the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18501.

As a condition to the grant or continuance of relief, the county may require the recipient to perform work provided by the county. Such work shall not be or replace work which otherwise would be undertaken through private or public employment. All persons performing such work shall be paid the prevailing wage scale for work of a similar character performed in the county.

No state funds shall be used for material or supplies, or for nonrelief employment, on work programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18502.

Persons who are eligible for aid to the aged under the Old Age Security Law, aid to the blind, aid to the disabled, or aid to families with dependent children (including the caretaker of such children), are not eligible for relief under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18503.

No person shall be considered a needy person who has made any voluntary assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of qualifying for relief, and any transfer of property, other than heirlooms, made without adequate consideration in money or property within a period of one year prior to making application for relief shall be presumed to have been made for the purpose of qualifying for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18504.

No person is eligible for relief who, being physically capable thereof, refuses suitable employment. The department shall define “suitable employment,” but no person shall be required to accept work where a labor dispute exists.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Responsibility for Repayment [18510. - 18511.]

18510.

Relief granted to any person who is not entitled thereto under the provisions of this chapter shall constitute a debt of the recipient, to the amount of such relief, to the state and the county participating in the granting of such relief. Recovery may be had upon such debt out of any property of the recipient not exempt from execution.

Any money refunded under the provisions of this section shall be repaid to the state and the county in the proportion that each contributed to the relief granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18511.

If the spouse, parent, or adult child of any recipient of relief is financially able to contribute to the support of the recipient, such relative is liable to reimburse the state and county for relief granted to the recipient to the extent of his financial ability so to do.

The board of supervisors of the county granting relief shall determine if the spouse, parent, or adult child has financial ability to support or contribute to the support of the recipient and was pecuniarily able to support or contribute to the support of the recipient during the time relief was provided to him. If, in the opinion of the board of supervisors, pecuniary ability existed when the relief was granted, and exists when the matter comes before the board of supervisors, the board shall request the district attorney or other civil legal officer of the county granting the relief to proceed against such responsible relative or relatives.

Upon such request, the district attorney or other civil legal officer shall maintain an action on behalf of the county granting relief against the relative or relatives to recover for the county the relief granted and to secure an order requiring the payment of any sums which may become due in the future.

All money collected by the county under the provisions of this section shall be credited to the state and the county in the proportion that each contributed to the relief granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Payment of Relief Costs [18520. - 18524.]

18520.

The provisions of this chapter providing for state payments to counties do not constitute appropriations of money from the State Treasury, and no provision of this chapter shall be construed to make an appropriation. No money shall be available for expenditure under this chapter until an appropriation for that purpose is made by the Legislature.

Any money appropriated to carry out the purposes of this chapter shall be deposited in, and disbursed from, the Relief Fund in the State Treasury, which fund is continued in existence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18521.

(a) Until the rate of county expenditure for the direct and administrative costs of welfare activities under this chapter exceeds, on a fiscal year basis determined not less frequently than quarterly, eight one-hundredths of 1 percent (.08%) of the total assessed valuation of the property subject to county taxation, the state shall not participate in the expenditure.

(b) With respect to county funds expended at a rate exceeding eight one-hundredths of 1 percent (.08%) of the total assessed valuation of the property subject to county taxation, but not exceeding twelve one-hundredths of 1 percent (.12%) thereof, the state shall pay each county eighty percent (80%) of such expenditures.

(c) With respect to county funds expended at a rate exceeding twelve one-hundredths of 1 percent (.12%) of the total assessed valuation of the property subject to county taxation, but not exceeding sixteen one-hundredths of 1 percent (.16%) thereof, the state shall pay each county ninety percent (90%) of such expenditures.

(d) With respect to county funds expended at a rate exceeding sixteen one-hundredths of 1 percent (.16%) of the total assessed valuation of the property subject to county taxation, the state shall pay each county ninety-five percent (95%) of such expenditures.

(e) The state shall pay to each county the full amount of the total costs of relief to persons who are residents of the state but who are not residents of any county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18522.

During such time as grants-in-aid are provided or made available by the United States government for either direct costs or administrative costs of welfare activities under this chapter, or both, the State Treasurer shall transfer the sums so granted to the Relief Fund. Of such sums, there shall be credited to the state an amount which bears the same proportion to the total of the sums so granted that the total state expenditure under this chapter during the period for which the grants are made bears to the total of both state and county expenditures under this chapter during that period. The remainder of such sums shall be credited to the counties of the state, and the State Treasurer shall pay to each county therefrom an amount which bears the same proportion to the whole of such remainder that the county funds expended by that county under this chapter during the period bears to the total of all county funds expended by all counties under this chapter during the period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18523.

The method of computing and paying the amounts provided for in Sections 18521 and 18522 for each quarter shall be as follows:

(a) The department shall, prior to the beginning of each quarter, estimate the amount to be paid for such quarter to each county under the provisions of Sections 18521 and 18522, such estimate to be based on a report filed by each county containing (1) its estimate of the total sum to be expended in such quarter in accordance with the provisions of this chapter; (2) records showing the number of individuals (cases) estimated to be in need of relief during the ensuing quarter; and (3) such other information and investigation as the department may find necessary.

(b) The department shall then certify to the State Controller the amounts so estimated by it for each county, reduced or increased as the case may be, by any sum by which it finds that its estimate for any prior quarter was greater or less than the amount which should have been paid to the county under this chapter for such quarter.

(c) The State Controller shall thereupon draw the necessary warrants, and prior to audit or settlement by the department and the State Controller, the State Treasurer shall pay to the treasurer of each county the amount so certified.

Upon the order of the department, the amount approved for the quarter may be paid in monthly installments and, if paid in monthly installments, all necessary adjustments for the prior quarters shall be made by additions or deductions from the allowance for the first month of each new quarter or in the manner prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

18524.

Reports of payments of relief and of payments for the cost of administration thereof made under this chapter shall be presented by the respective counties at times and in the form prescribed by the department.

Such reports shall be audited by the department and the State Controller and, when and in the amount approved, shall be allowed to the county as a credit to apply against advances made under the terms of Section 18523.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. State Programs for the Blind Other Than Public Assistance [18650. - 18650.]



  ARTICLE 2. Oakland Orientation Center for the Blind [18650. - 18650.]

18650.

Every blind person who was a resident of the Oakland Orientation Center for the Blind on March 1, 1951, who may be transferred to other facilities either public or private and who is unable to work, shall be considered as a beneficiary of the state in exercise of the power to assist the handicapped, and when he has no other source of income or support, including receipt of benefits under any public assistance program, shall receive not less than two dollars ($2) per week as aid for his personal needs. Such payments shall be made from funds appropriated for the support of the department.

The director may contract with public or private agencies for the proper care of all residents who may be transferred from the Oakland Orientation Center for the Blind to other public or private facilities. Payments for the support of all persons so transferred shall be made from funds appropriated for the support of the department.

All residents who are transferred from the Oakland Orientation Center for the Blind to other facilities shall be provided at the expense of the state with room, board, medical, dental and eye care, and such other services as may be deemed necessary by the director.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 18651 by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1381.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. State Healthy Food Access Policy [18700. - 18700.]

18700.

(a) (1) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of the state that every human being has the right to access sufficient affordable and healthy food.

(2) Food insecurity is defined as the occasional or constant lack of access to the food one needs to live a healthy life and the uncertainty of being able to acquire enough food to meet the needs of an individual or household due to insufficient money or other resources.

(b) All relevant state agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the State
 Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Education, and the State Department of Public Health, shall consider this state policy when revising, adopting, or establishing policies, regulations, and grant criteria when those policies, regulations, and criteria are pertinent to the distribution of sufficient affordable food.

(c) This section does not expand any obligation of the state to provide food or nutrition assistance or to require the expenditure of additional resources to develop food infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 879, Sec. 2.   (SB 628)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. CalFresh [18900. - 18929.]

18900.

Finding that hunger, undernutrition, and malnutrition are present and continuing problems faced by low-income California households, and further finding that the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011), Title 7, United States Code) offers significant health-vital benefits, the purpose of this chapter is to establish a statewide program to enable recipients of aid under Part 3 (commencing with Section 11000) or Part 5 (commencing with Section 17000) of this division and other low-income households to receive benefits under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 68.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.1.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall propose a new name for the Food Stamp Program in California, by July 1, 2009. The department shall convene stakeholders to develop the new name, as provided in subdivision (b). The new name shall reflect one or more of the following concepts:

(1) That food stamps are no longer delivered by stamps.

(2) That food stamps support healthy living.

(3) That food stamps are important to agriculture in California.

(4) That food stamps would be better viewed as a health and nutrition program than as a welfare program.

(b) The department shall convene a diverse group of stakeholders to develop the new name, including representatives from agencies working to improve health and reduce diet-related illnesses.

(c) The department is encouraged to test the impact the new name would have on improving the perception of the program among low-income residents, and on increasing program participation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.2.

(a) Pursuant to Section 18900.1, the name of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011) Title 7 of the United States Code) as administered in California shall be CalFresh.

(b) Any reference in any other law to the Food Stamp program shall refer to CalFresh.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 69.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.3.

Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for these purposes, in order to increase client access and retention within CalFresh, on or before July 1, 2023, the department shall develop a CalFresh user-centered simplified paper application that minimizes the burdens of the overall enrollment process for households that include older adults 60 years of age or older, or the age otherwise applicable under federal law, and people with disabilities who are eligible to be enrolled in the Elderly Simplified Application Project, a demonstration project operated by the United States Department of Agriculture. To the extent that the Elderly Simplified Application Project is no longer operational, the department shall maintain the simplified paper application for older adults and people with disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 77.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.4.

(a) (1) To the extent permitted under federal law, an individual shall have the option to complete an application or recertification interview and provide the required client signature by telephone.

(2) To fulfill the requirements of paragraph (1), counties may implement any method of electronic signature, including telephonic signature, in compliance with state and federal program requirements, that is supported by county business practices and available technology.

(3) Counties currently using the Consortium IV (C-IV) or LEADER Replacement System (LRS) of the Statewide Automated Welfare System (SAWS) shall comply with this subdivision beginning on or
 before January 1, 2023, and counties currently using the CalWORKs Information Network (CalWIN) system of SAWS shall comply with this section beginning on or before January 1, 2024.

(b) (1) The department, in consultation with counties, representatives of the statewide automated welfare system consortia, recognized exclusive representatives of eligibility workers, and advocates for CalFresh participants shall develop recommendations to implement a fully telephone-based service model statewide, including, but not limited to, the ability to complete the application, semi-annual report and recertification processes by telephone in all counties. The recommendations shall assess implementation of a telephone-based service model statewide in addition to, not in place of, existing options to complete the application, semi-annual report, and recertification for CalFresh in person, by mail, or online.

(2) The recommendations shall be provided to the Legislature during the 2022–23 budget hearings.

(3) The fully telephone-based service model assessed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall, to the extent permitted under federal law, satisfy both of the following criteria:

(A) Use simple, user-friendly language and instructions for CalFresh applicants, participants, eligibility workers, and application assisters.

(B) Provide service and assistance to applicants and participants in a manner that is accessible to individuals with disabilities and those who have limited English proficiency as required by applicable state and federal laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 78.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that recipients of Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3, may receive CalFresh benefits if otherwise eligible. Households described in this section and Sections 18900.6 and 18900.7 shall include households receiving benefits under Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930). It is the intent of the Legislature to continue funding a hold harmless for populations described in Sections 18900.6 and 18900.7 beyond 2018–19, until natural program attrition within these populations negates the need for additional funding. It is the intent of the Legislature to provide ongoing funding for county administration for implementation of this section and funding for county
 administration for implementation of the hold harmless pursuant to Sections 18900.6 and 18900.7 for the duration of the hold harmless enacted by either of those sections.

(b) The department shall notify the federal Commissioner of Social Security and the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture that the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 do not include the bonus value of food stamps, as described in subdivision (g) of Section 2015 of Title 7 of the United States Code, effective June 1, 2019, unless the department notifies the Department of Finance that automation will not be complete by that date, in which case the department shall notify the Department of Finance of the date automation will be complete and the alternate implementation date, which shall be no later than August 1, 2019. No later than August 1, 2018, the
 department shall provide counties with instructions necessary to complete automation related to implementation of this section and Sections 18900.6 and 18900.7 by August 1, 2019.

(c) Subdivision (b) shall be implemented as follows:

(1) As of June 1, 2019, or the alternate implementation date described in subdivision (b), an individual who is otherwise eligible for CalFresh benefits and who is not in an existing CalFresh household as an excluded member, shall become eligible for CalFresh benefits notwithstanding that the individual is a recipient of Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3.

(2) (A) For all existing CalFresh households as of June 1, 2019, or the alternate implementation date described
 in subdivision (b), that as a result of subdivision (b) include a previously excluded individual who receives Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3, the county welfare department shall implement this provision by adding that individual, or those individuals, to the existing CalFresh household, and determining continuing eligibility and benefits pursuant to Sections 18901, 18901.7, and Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930), at the next periodic report or recertification, as described in Sections 18910 and 18910.1. This shall include households that temporarily lose their eligibility on or before the date when the SSI recipient would be added and have their benefits restored within 30 days of that date based on good cause or providing the necessary information to restore eligibility.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an existing CalFresh
 household described in that subparagraph may request, at any time following June 1, 2019, or the alternate implementation date described in subdivision (b), and before the next periodic report or recertification, that a previously excluded individual who receives Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3, be added to the CalFresh household. Upon this request, the county welfare department shall determine continuing eligibility and benefits pursuant to Sections 18901, 18901.7, and Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930).

(3) (A) For a new CalFresh household enrolled within six calendar months of June 1, 2019, or the alternate implementation date described in subdivision (b), which consists entirely of individuals receiving Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3
 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 and is eligible for a certification period of 24 or 36 months, the household’s initial certification period may be no more than six months shorter than the maximum period allowable to help spread the workload of periodic reports and recertifications, and manage caseload relative to timeliness and accuracy standards.

(B) For a CalFresh household that is not described in subparagraph (A), the household’s certification period shall be the maximum allowed by federal law for the household type, unless the county complies with subdivision (b) of Section 18910, or, on a case-by-case basis only, the household’s individual circumstances require a shorter certification period.

(d) This section and Sections 18900.6 and 18900.7 shall be implemented by the department in consultation with stakeholders and counties. Beginning July 1, 2018, and quarterly
 thereafter through June 2019, or the alternate implementation date described in subdivision (b), the department shall convene discussions with the Legislature regarding implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 117.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.6.

(a) There is hereby created the SSI/SSP Cash-In Supplemental Nutrition Benefit (SNB) Program.

(b) The department shall use state funds appropriated for this program to provide nutrition benefits to continuing CalFresh households that were eligible for and receiving CalFresh benefits as of June 1, 2019, or the alternate implementation date described in subdivision (b) of Section 18900.5, but for whom the household’s monthly CalFresh benefit was reduced when a previously excluded individual was added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(c) (1) The amount of SNB provided to each household shall be based on an SNB table developed by the
 department.
